Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.250

Annual reports—Recommendation regarding additional schools.

(1) By March 1st of each year beginning in the first year after there have been charter schools operating for a full school year, the state board of education, in collaboration with the commission, must issue a report on the performance of the state's charter schools during the preceding school year to the governor, the legislature, and the public at large.

(2) The annual report must be based on the reports submitted by each authorizer as well as any additional relevant data compiled by the state board of education. The report must include a comparison of the performance of charter school students with the performance of academically, ethnically, and economically comparable groups of students in other public schools. In addition, the annual report must include the state board of education's assessment of the successes, challenges, and areas for improvement in meeting the purposes of this chapter, including the board's assessment of the sufficiency of funding for charter schools, the efficacy of the formula for authorizer funding, and any suggested changes in state law or policy necessary to strengthen the state's charter schools.

(3) Together with the issuance of the annual report following the fifth year after there have been charter schools operating for a full school year, the state board of education, in collaboration with the commission, shall submit a recommendation regarding whether or not the legislature should authorize the establishment of additional charter public schools.

[ 2020 c 49 s 3; 2016 c 241 s 125. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 225 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]